District of Columbia statutes.
46-408

Repealed

Celebration of marriage without license.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1392, ch. 854, § 1290
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 543, ch. 1329
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 264, Pub. L. 89-493, § 13(a)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(n), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 30-108.
1973 Ed., § 30-108.